sv: Pedaltyp: Dubbelsidig (Look Delta och platt); Dubbelsidig (SPD och platt); Plattformspedal; Look Delta-klickpedal; SPD-klickpedal; Pedalkorg; Universell klickpedal; Övrigt
pt-BR: Pedal tipo: Dupla face (Look Delta e plataforma); Dupla face (SPD e plataforma); Plataforma; Encaixe Look Delta; Encaixe SPD; Firma-pé; Encaixe universal; Outro
fi: Polkimen tyyppi: Kaksipuolinen (Look Delta ja litteä); Kaksipuolinen (SPD ja litteä); Avopoljin; Lukkopoljin (Look Delta); Lukkopoljin (SPD); Häkkipoljin; Lukkopoljin (yleismalli); Muu
ko: 페달 유형: 양면(룩 델타 및 평페달); 양면(SPD 및 평페달); 평페달; 룩 델타 클립리스; SPD 클립리스; 토 케이지; 범용 클립리스; 기타
vi: Loại bàn đạp: Hai mặt (Look Delta & phẳng); Hai mặt (SPD & phẳng); Dạng bệ phẳng; Look Delta không kẹp; SPD không kẹp; Rọ kẹp mũi chân; Không kẹp đa năng; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de pedală: Cu două fețe (Look Delta și plată); Cu două fețe (SPD și plată); Platformă plată; Automate Look Delta; Automate SPD; Cu ratrape; Automate universale; Altele
de: Pedaltyp: Beidseitig (Look Delta & Flat); Beidseitig (SPD & Flat); Plattform; Look Delta (Klickpedal); SPD (Klickpedal); Käfigpedal; Universal (Klickpedal); Sonstige
ja: ペダルタイプ: 両面（Look Delta & フラット）; 両面（SPD & フラット）; フラットプラットフォーム; Look Delta ビンディング; SPD ビンディング; トゥークリップ; ユニバーサルビンディング; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta pedala: Obojestranska (Look Delta in ravna); Obojestranska (SPD in ravna); Ravna platforma; Na vpenjanje (Look Delta); Na vpenjanje (SPD); S košarico; Na vpenjanje (univerzalna); Drugo
zh-CN: 踏板类型: 双面（Look Delta 和平踏）; 双面（SPD 和平踏）; 平面踏板; Look Delta 锁踏; SPD 锁踏; 狗嘴套踏板; 通用锁踏; 其他
cs: Typ pedálu: Oboustranné (Look Delta a ploché); Oboustranné (SPD a ploché); Plochá platforma; Look Delta nášlapné; SPD nášlapné; Klipsna; Univerzální nášlapné; Ostatní
hr-HR: Vrsta pedale: Dvostrana (Look Delta i ravna); Dvostrana (SPD i ravna); Ravna platforma; Look Delta bez kopče; SPD bez kopče; S košaricom; Univerzalna bez kopče; Ostalo
tr: Pedal tipi: Çift taraflı (Look Delta ve düz); Çift taraflı (SPD ve düz); Düz platform; Look Delta kilitli; SPD kilitli; Kalpiye; Evrensel kilitli; Diğer
ru: Тип педалей: Двусторонняя (Look Delta и плоская); Двусторонняя (SPD и плоская); Плоская платформа; Контактная Look Delta; Контактная SPD; С туклипсами; Универсальная контактная; Другое
nl: Pedaaltype: Dubbelzijdig (Look Delta en plat); Dubbelzijdig (SPD en plat); Plat platform; Look Delta klikpedaal; SPD klikpedaal; Toeclip; Universeel klikpedaal; Overig
lt-LT: Pedalų tipas: Dvipusis („Look Delta“ ir plokščias); Dvipusis (SPD ir plokščias); Plokščia platforma; „Look Delta“ kontaktinis; SPD kontaktinis; Su fiksatoriais (krepšelio tipo); Universalus kontaktinis; Kita
bg-BG: Тип педал: Двустранен (Look Delta и плосък); Двустранен (SPD и плосък); Плоска платформа; Автоматични Look Delta; Автоматични SPD; Туклипси; Универсални автоматични; Друг
en: Pedal type: Dual-sided (Look Delta & flat); Dual-sided (SPD & flat); Flat platform; Look Delta clipless; SPD clipless; Toe cage; Universal clipless; Other
fr: Type de pédales: Double face (Look Delta et plate); Double face (SPD et plate); Plateforme plate; Look Delta automatique; SPD automatique; Cale-pied; Automatique universelle; Autre
it: Tipo di pedale: A doppia faccia (Look Delta e flat); A doppia faccia (SPD e flat); Piattaforma flat; Look Delta clipless; SPD clipless; Puntale con cinghia; Universale clipless; Altro
zh-TW: 踏板類型: 雙面 (Look Delta 和平踏); 雙面 (SPD 和平踏); 平踏板; Look Delta 卡踏; SPD 卡踏; 狗嘴套; 通用卡踏; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de pedal: Dupla face (Look Delta e plano); Dupla face (SPD e plano); Plataforma plana; De encaixe Look Delta; De encaixe SPD; Biqueira; De encaixe universal; Outro
nb: Pedaltype: Dobbeltsidig (Look Delta og flat); Dobbeltsidig (SPD og flat); Flat plattform; Look Delta klikkpedal; SPD klikkpedal; Tåklips; Universell klikkpedal; Annet
el: Τύπος πεντάλ: Δύο όψεων (Look Delta & επίπεδο); Δύο όψεων (SPD & επίπεδο); Επίπεδη πλατφόρμα; Look Delta κουμπωτό; SPD κουμπωτό; Καλουπιέ; Γενικής χρήσης κουμπωτό; Άλλο
pl: Typ pedałów: Dwustronny (Look Delta i platformowy); Dwustronny (SPD i platformowy); Płaski platformowy; Zatrzaskowy Look Delta; Zatrzaskowy SPD; Z koszykiem (noskiem); Uniwersalny zatrzaskowy; Inne
hu: Pedál típusa: Kétoldalas (Look Delta és lapos); Kétoldalas (SPD és lapos); Lapos platform; Look Delta patentpedál (clipless); SPD patentpedál; Klipszes pedál; Univerzális patentpedál; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ pedálu: Obojstranný (Look Delta a plochý); Obojstranný (SPD a plochý); Plochá platforma; Nášľapný Look Delta; Nášľapný SPD; S klipsňou; Univerzálny nášľapný; Iné
es: Tipo de pedales: Doble cara (Look Delta y plano); Doble cara (SPD y plano); Plataforma plana; Automático Look Delta; Automático SPD; Puntera con correa; Automático universal; Otro
da: Pedaltype: Dobbeltsidet (Look Delta og flad); Dobbeltsidet (SPD og flad); Flad platform; Look Delta klikpedal; SPD klikpedal; Tåclips; Universel klikpedal; Andet
th: ประเภทแป้นเหยียบ: ใช้งานได้สองด้าน (Look Delta และแบบเรียบ); ใช้งานได้สองด้าน (SPD และแบบเรียบ); แป้นเหยียบแบบเรียบ; คลีท Look Delta; คลีท SPD; ตะกร้อคล้องเท้า; คลีทอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ